Montana, session 2025, HB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 80-7-1014, MCA, is amended to read:
"80-7-1014. Penalty. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), the Except as provided in subsection
(2), the following penalties apply:
(a) The offense of negligently violating the provisions of 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-
1015 or rules adopted under 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 pertaining to an invasive species
management area or the statewide invasive species management area is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine
not to exceed $500 $700 for the first offense and $750 $1,400 for subsequent offenses.
(b) The offense of purposely or knowingly violating the provisions of 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012
and 80-7-1015 or rules adopted under 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 pertaining to an invasive
species management area or the statewide invasive species management area is a misdemeanor punishable
by a fine not to exceed $975 $1,950. In addition, the person shall forfeit the following as issued by this state:
(i) any current fishing license and the privilege to fish in this state for a period of time set by the
court; and
(ii) any current sticker or decal required under this part to operate a vessel on the waters of this
state.
(c) Purposely or knowingly attempting to introduce an invasive species in Montana is a felony. Any
person found guilty under this subsection (1)(c) is subject to a criminal penalty of up to 2 years in prison, a fine
not to exceed $10,000 $25,000, or both. A person convicted of violating this subsection (1)(c) may also be
required to surrender an involved vessel and pay restitution for any cost incurred to mitigate the effect of the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 242
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 242
violation.
(d) A civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 may be imposed on any person who violates any other
provision of 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 or rules adopted under 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012
and 80-7-1015 not enumerated in subsections (1)(a) through (1)(c).
(2) A warning without penalty may be issued to any person violating the provisions of 80-7-1010
through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 or rules adopted under 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 if it is
determined that a warning best serves the public interest.
(2) A warning without penalty may be issued to any person violating the provisions of 80-7-1010
through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 or rules adopted under 80-7-1010 through 80-7-1012 and 80-7-1015 if it is
determined that a warning best serves the public interest.
(3) No penalty may be issued to any person violating the provisions of 80-7-1011 if clear and
adequate signage is not posted a reasonable distance from the check station.
(3)(4) Civil penalties collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 242
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 242, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 242
INTRODUCED BY T. MILLETT, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT REVISING FINES FOR ILLEGALLY TRANSPORTING AQUATIC INVASIVE SPECIES; REMOVING
THE OPTION TO ISSUE A WARNING WITHOUT PENALTY;AND AMENDING SECTION 80-7-1014, MCA.”